District of Columbia statutes.
29-311.14

Payment.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in § 29-311.15, within 30 days after the form required by § 29-311.12(b)(2)(B) is due, the corporation shall pay in cash to those shareholders who complied with § 29-311.13(a) the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of their shares, plus interest.

(b)

The payment to each shareholder pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be accompanied by:

(1)

The annual financial statements specified in § 29-313.07(a) of the corporation that issued the shares to be appraised, which shall be of a date ending not more than 16 months before the date of payment and shall comply with § 29-313.07(b); provided, that if such annual financial statements are not reasonably available, the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information, and the latest available quarterly financial statements of such corporation, if any;

(2)

A statement of the corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares, which estimate shall equal or exceed the corporation’s estimate given pursuant to § 29-311.12(b)(2)(C);

(3)

A statement that shareholders described in subsection (a) of this section have the right to demand further payment under § 29-311.16 and that if any such shareholder does not do so within the time period specified therein, the shareholder shall be deemed to have accepted such payment in full satisfaction of the corporation’s obligations under this subchapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-311.15, § 29-311.16, and § 29-311.31.